Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3520
Homestead; exemption; Tax Commissioner; rejection or reduction; petition; contents; hearing; appeal.

In any case when the Tax Commissioner rejects or reduces a claim for exemption, the applicant may obtain a hearing before the Tax Commissioner by filing a written petition with the Tax Commissioner within thirty days from the receipt of the notice of rejection or reduction. The petition shall state, in clear and concise language, (1) the amount in controversy, (2) the issues involved, (3) the name and address of the applicant, and (4) a demand for relief. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Notice of the Tax Commissioner's decision shall be mailed to the applicant within seven days after the decision. The applicant may appeal the Tax Commissioner's decision to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013 within thirty days after the decision.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 20;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 45.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.